Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.550

Off-street parking space and facilities—Authorized—Declared public use.

Towns are authorized to provide off-street parking space and facilities for motor vehicles, and the use of real property for such purpose is declared to be a public use.

[ 1994 c 81 s 54; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.550. Prior: 1961 c 33 s 1.]

NOTES:

Off-street parking facilities, cities of the first, second, and third classes: Chapter 35.86 RCW.